Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB560.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 405.1C. Pennsylvania Preferred® Food Bucks Program.--(a) The Pennsylvania Preferred® Food Bucks Program is established in the department and:(1) The program shall provide benefit incentives for SNAP recipients who redeem SNAP benefits for the targeted food items specified under subsection (c).(2) The department may allocate money available for the program to a Pennsylvania nonprofit organization or entity that meets the criteria specified under subsection (b) for the purpose of administering the program throughout this 12345678910111213141516171819 Commonwealth.(b) The department shall develop an application to receive a grant to administer the program. To be eligible to receive a grant to administer the program, an applicant shall submit the application to the department and meet all of the following criteria:(1) The applicant shall be a Pennsylvania nonprofit organization or entity.(2) The applicant shall submit a plan to the department for the preparation and development of the infrastructure necessary to administer the program for the sale of the targeted food items specified under subsection (c) at participating food retailers, including farmers markets, farm stands, mobile markets, community supported agriculture sites, corner stores, rural grocery stores and supermarkets.(3) The applicant shall conduct research and evaluate the program in accordance with any requirements of the Federal or State grants awarded for the program.(4) The applicant shall evaluate the impact of the program on purchases made by SNAP recipients and the benefit of the purchases for farmers and businesses in this Commonwealth.(5) The applicant shall commit to using no less than the minimum percentage of money required for benefit incentives to qualify for a Federal large-scale project grant under the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334, 132 Stat. 4490) through the Gus Schumacher Nutrition Incentive Program.(6) The applicant shall agree to provide a benefit incentive of no less than forty cents (40¢) to a SNAP recipient for every one dollar ($1) of SNAP benefits redeemed by the SNAP recipient 20250SB0560PN0552 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the targeted food items specified under subsection (c).(7) The applicant shall agree to coordinate the marketing of the program with the Pennsylvania Preferred ® Program under 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 46 Subch. B (relating to Pennsylvania Preferred ® Program).(8) The applicant shall give preference to retailers and markets who sell Pennsylvania-grown agricultural commodities or agricultural commodities designated with the Pennsylvania Preferred ® trademark as defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 4602 (relating to definitions).(c) To be eligible for a benefit incentive under the program, the targeted food items shall meet the criteria specified in the definition of "food" in 7 U.S.C. § 2012(k) (relating to definitions) and shall include fruits and vegetables, whether fresh, canned, dried or frozen whole or cut without added sugars, fats, oils or salt.(d) The mechanism for delivering benefit incentives under the program shall be determined by a grantee selected to administer the program under subsection (b) in conjunction with the department.(e) The department, in conjunction with the Department of Agriculture, may use all of the following for the administration of the program:(1) A Federal large-scale project grant under the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 through the Gus Schumacher Nutrition Incentive Program.(2) Money appropriated by the General Assembly for benefits for the program.(3) Any other money made available for the program.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20250SB0560PN0552 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Program" means the Pennsylvania Preferred ® Food Bucks Program established under subsection (a)."SNAP" means the Federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0560PN0552 - 4 - 123456